Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 2

Tennessee Mineral Surface Mining Law of 1972

59-8-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Mineral Surface Mining Law of 1972.”

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-1540; Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 37.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of surface mining and reclamation and its functions under parts 2 and 3 of this chapter and ch. 10 of this title, from the department of conservation (now environment and conservation) to the department of health and environment (now health), see Executive Order No. 40 (February 11, 1983).

For transfer of the bureau of environment in the department of health and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee environmental statutes (excluding title 68, chs. 14, 110 and 112) from the department of health to the department of environment and conservation, see Executive Order No. 42 (February 4, 1991).

Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 1 provided that references in this part to the commissioner or the department of health, health and environment, or public health, are amended to become references to the commissioner or department of environment and conservation.

Cross-References. Coal surface mining, title 59, ch. 8, parts 3 and 4.

Major energy projects, coordination of regulation, title 13, ch. 18.

Printed contract forms for products extracted from or beneath the earth, §47-50-110.

Severance tax on coal, title 67, ch. 7, part 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 41; 18 Tenn. Juris., §§ 3, 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Application to removal of clay for landfill construction, OAG 97-048, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/14/97).

Constitutionality of population exemption under Tennessee mineral surface mining law, OAG 97-046, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 45 (4/14/97).

59-8-202. Definitions. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (3) and Compiler’s Notes.]

Except as otherwise required by the context, the following terms when used in this part or in regulations issued thereunder shall be construed to mean:

“Area affected” means the area of land from which overburden is to be or has been removed and upon which a spoil bank is to be or has been deposited. It also includes areas of land on which haul roads or other access roads (other than public roads) are to be or have been located. Insofar as clay is concerned, affected land shall not be construed to include land upon which overburden is deposited if, in the opinion of the commissioner, the deposition of such overburden amounts to reclamation of a previously mined area;

“Bench” means the ledge, shelf or terrace formed in the contour method of surface mining;

“Fill bench” means that portion of the bench which is formed by depositing overburden beyond the cut section; and

“Solid bench” means the portion of the bench between the highwall and the fill bench and thereby within the region once occupied by the mineral or overburden;

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

“Board” means the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, established by § 69-3-104;

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation or the commissioner's designees;

“Director” means the director of the division of water pollution control;

“Highwall” means a slope in excess of thirty-five degrees (35°) which is created by mining operations;

“Mineral” means, in any county having a population of more than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, clay, stone, gravel, sand, phosphate rock, metallic ore and any other solid material or substance of commercial value found in natural deposits on or in the earth, but does not include limestone, coal, marble, chert or dimension stone;

“Mineral” means, in any county having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or less, according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, clay, stone, phosphate rock, metallic ore, and any other solid material or substance of commercial value found in natural deposits on or in the earth, but does not include limestone, coal, marble, chert, gravel, sand or dimension stone;

“Mineral” means, on any land on which the state, or any department, agency, or other unit of state government, owns the surface interest, clay, stone, gravel, sand, phosphate rock, metallic ore, and any other solid material or substance of commercial value found in natural deposits on or in the earth, but does not include coal;

“Operation” means all of the premises, facilities, and equipment and the use thereof in the process of removing and exploring for minerals from a designated surface mine area;

“Operator” means any person, partnership or corporation engaged in surface mining who removes or intends to remove more than two hundred fifty (250) tons of any mineral from the earth by surface mining within twelve (12) successive calendar months; or who removes overburden for the purpose of determining the location, quality or quantity of any natural mineral deposit. Any operator who has obtained a permit, and otherwise complied with this part may subcontract any part, or all, of the mining of the lands covered by the permit to subcontractors and such subcontractors are not considered an “operator” within the meaning of this part;

“Orphan mine” means land affected by surface mining operations prior to enactment of the Tennessee Strip Mine Law of 1967 (repealed);

“Overburden” means all earth and other materials which are removed to gain access to the mineral in the process of surface mining;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation or any other association of individuals;

“Provisions of this part” means the rules, regulations and orders issued by the commissioner pursuant to this part as well as the words of the sections themselves;

“Reclamation” means the process of backfilling, grading and shaping of the disturbed land in the affected area, constructing water control facilities, the taking of measures to control current or future air, water or soil pollution, and the planting of vegetation, and other measures; all directed toward placing the affected area in a condition whereby it can serve some purpose, at least as useful as that in existence before any mining;

“Shaping” means grading, backfilling and other earth moving required by this part to be done by the operator in connection with the reclamation of the area affected;

“Spoil bank” means the overburden as it is piled or deposited in the process of surface mining;

“Stream” means any waterway that normally exhibits water flow at least six (6) consecutive months per year; and

“Surface mining” means all or any part of the process followed in the production of minerals from a natural mineral deposit by the open pit or open cut method, auger method, highwall mining method which requires a new cut or removal of overburden, or any other mining process in which the strata or overburden is removed or displaced in order to recover the mineral; or in which the surface soil is disturbed or removed for the purpose of determining the location, quality or quantity of a natural mineral deposit.

“Board” means the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, established by §69-3-104;

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 2; 1974, ch. 590, § 2; 1975, ch. 188, § 1; 1975, ch. 310, § 1; 1976, ch. 752, § 1; 1978, ch. 679, § 3; T.C.A., § 58-1541; Acts 1980, ch. 695, § 1; 1980, ch. 908, § 38; 1981, ch. 406, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 1004, § 1; 1992, ch. 693, § 1; 2009, ch. 211, § 1; 2011, ch. 341, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 839, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee Strip Mine Law of 1967 was repealed by § 26 of Acts 1972, ch. 547.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

For the Preamble to the act concerning reclamation after extraction of minerals on state-owned land, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 211.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104, referred to in this section, to substitute “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board of energy and natural resources” for “board of water quality, oil, and gas” in the definition of “board”. See the Compiler's Notes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Cross-References. Conveyance of certain mineral rights and mineral interests, §66-5-111.

Rock harvesting operations, §§69-3-143 —69-3-147.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 3.

59-8-203. Purpose of act.

The general assembly finds that the unregulated surface mining of minerals can cause soil erosion and landslides, stream pollution, and accumulation and seepage of contaminated water; contributes to floods; impairs the value of land for agricultural or other purposes; affects fish and wildlife and their habitats; counteracts efforts for the conservation of soil, water and other natural resources; impairs the owners' rights in neighboring property; creates fire hazards; and in general creates conditions inimical to life, property and the public welfare so as to require the exercise of the state's police power in the regulation of surface mining. The general assembly further finds that there are wide variations in the circumstances and conditions surrounding and arising out of the surface mining of minerals due primarily to differences in topographical, geological, and soil conditions, by reason of which it is necessary, in order to provide the most effective, beneficial and equitable solution to the problem, that broad discretion be placed in the authority designated to administer and enforce the regulatory provisions enacted by the general assembly. It is the purpose of this part, therefore, to provide for such regulation and control of surface mining so as to minimize its injurious effects.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 3; T.C.A., § 58-1542.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 14.

59-8-204. Powers of the commissioner.

The commissioner shall exercise the following authority and powers to:

Administer and enforce the provisions of this part and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated thereunder;

Conduct or obtain investigations, research, experiments, training programs and demonstrations, and to collect and disseminate information relating to surface mining, reclamation of surface mined lands, and control of pollution of water and soil affected by surface mining;

Adopt, after giving public notice and affording an opportunity to all interested persons to appear and offer evidence at a public hearing in connection therewith, general rules and regulations pertaining to surface mining to accomplish the purposes of this part. Such rules and regulations, which shall have the force and effect of law, shall be of uniform application as far as practicable, but they may take proper account of differences in topography, geology, and soil conditions, and established use patterns of neighboring lands as recognized by the local planning agency;

Adopt, without notice or hearing, rules and regulations with respect to procedural aspects of hearings, the filing of reports and orders, the issuance of permits, and other procedural matters;

Issue orders requiring the adoption by an operator of remedial measures necessary for carrying out the provisions of this part or rules and regulations issued thereunder;

Examine and approve or disapprove applications for permits, bonds, mining and reclamation plans, revegetation plans, and after-use plans submitted by operators;

Establish standards for acceptable mining and reclamation of affected areas which shall be designed to achieve soil stabilization, control soil erosion, and obliterate the scars of the stripping operation and ensure that the operation meets applicable soil and water quality standards;

Make such investigations or inspections as the commissioner may deem necessary to ensure compliance with any provisions of this part, including the right to enter at any time upon an area affected for such purposes and the right to ingress and egress across intervening properties;

Order the suspension and/or revocation after warning of any permit for failure to comply with any of the provisions of this part or with any rules, regulations or orders adopted pursuant thereto;

Order the immediate cessation of any operation that is started or continued without a permit as required by the provisions of this part;

Issue, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, special rules and regulations in connection with granting a permit to an operator where the sole purpose of the operation covered by such permit is to remove overburden for the purpose of determining the location, quality or quantity of a natural mineral deposit. Such rules and regulations shall be, insofar as practical, in compliance with the requirements of this part that pertain to the granting of a mining permit so that a map, mining plan, reclamation and vegetation plan and bond are required. The commissioner shall deny such permits for areas which cannot be granted a general permit under the provisions of this part;

Institute and prosecute all such court actions as may be necessary to obtain the enforcement of any order issued by the commissioner in carrying out the provisions of this part; and

Issue regulations concerning blasting which are designed to protect the water resource, prevent off-site damage to citizens and property, and prevent spoil from being thrown off of the permitted area where no spoil placement is permitted by the approved reclamation plan.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 4; 1974, ch. 590, § 9; 1977, ch. 34, § 1; T.C.A., § 58-1543; Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 39.

59-8-205. Permits, requirements and criteria — Amendment — Appeal upon failure to grant — Renewal.

No operator shall engage in surface mining without having first obtained from the commissioner a permit therefor. This permit shall authorize the operator to engage in surface mining upon the area of land described in the operator's application for a period not to exceed five (5) years from the date of its issuance. Such permit shall be granted by the commissioner only if the requirements and criteria set forth in subdivisions (a)(3)-(9) and any rules and regulations pertaining to those requirements are satisfied, and only upon the submission by the operator and approval by the commissioner of a bond as provided in § 59-8-207 and a mining and reclamation plan as provided in § 59-8-208.

The granting of such permit shall also be subject to payment by the operator of the fee prescribed in § 59-8-206 and upon submission of the following information:

The name and permanent address of the operator as well as any temporary address to be used by the operator in connection with the operation covered by the permit. If the operator is other than an individual or corporation, the names and permanent addresses of all persons having an interest in the operation shall be listed. If the operation is a corporation, the names and permanent addresses of all persons owning ten percent (10%) or more of the stock shall be listed;

A map showing the general location of the affected area with relation to property lines, nearby towns, county lines, public roads, and streams;

Identification of any surface mining permit or permits which the operator (or any person having an interest in the operation) holds or has previously held in Tennessee, together with a statement of whether or not any surface mine permit previously held by applicant operator or any person, partnership, or corporation now associated with, or in the past associated with, the applicant operator was suspended, revoked or terminated for failure to comply with the reclamation or revegetation requirements of such surface mining permit or permits, and a statement of whether or not any surface mine permit in any other state previously held by the applicant operator or any person, partnership, or corporation now associated with, or in the past associated with, the applicant operator was suspended, revoked or terminated for failure to comply with the reclamation and revegetation requirements of such permit and the penalty imposed, if any, in addition to such suspension, revocation or termination;

Identification of the owner or owners or designated representative of the surface of the area affected by the permit, and the identification of the owner or owners of all surface area within five hundred feet (500') of any part of the area;

Identification of the owner or owners of the minerals to be mined;

Identification of the source of the operator's legal right to enter and mine the minerals on the land affected by the permit; and

A copy of the operator's discharge permit from the division of water quality control, or a letter from the division of water management stating that no discharge will take place and, therefore, no permit is required.

The commissioner may provide for amendment of the permit of any operator who is otherwise complying with the provisions of this part upon payment of the specified supplemental fee. If the application for an amendment of the permit provides for an increase or reduction in the acreage covered by it, the operator shall specify in writing any pertinent changes in the information furnished in the original application for a permit, and shall amend the bond and the mining and reclamation plan previously submitted, as necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this part. The commissioner's approval of a proposed amendment of the permit shall be subject to the commissioner's approval of the revised (or a new) bond and mining and reclamation plan, and further, subject to the commissioner's determination that the amendment satisfies the requirements and criteria set forth in subdivisions (a)(3)-(9), as well as any rules and regulations pertaining to those requirements.

An on-the-ground inspection of the proposed affected area will be made by the commissioner or the commissioner's representative before a permit is issued.

No application for a permit shall be approved by the commissioner if there is found, on the basis of the information set forth in the application or by on-the-ground inspection, that the requirements of this part, or regulations stemming therefrom, will not or cannot be observed, or that there is probable cause to believe that the proposed method of operation, road system construction, shaping or revegetation of the affected area cannot be carried out in a manner consistent with the purpose of this part and applicable air, noise, and water quality standards of this state.

If the commissioner finds that the overburden on any part of the area of land described in the application would be such that landslides, deposition of sediment in stream beds or water pollution cannot be strictly controlled, the commissioner shall delete such part of the land from the area for which the permit is granted.

No permit for mining shall be granted if:

The applicant has had a Tennessee surface mine permit revoked or suspended and the bond forfeited;

The applicant is or was a partner in a partnership or was an officer, director or owner of ten percent (10%) or more of the stock of a corporation which has had a Tennessee surface mine permit revoked or suspended and the bond forfeited; or

In the event that the applicant is a corporation or partnership, any partner in the partnership, or any officer, director or owner of ten percent (10%) or more of the stock of the corporation has had a Tennessee surface mine permit revoked or suspended and bond forfeited;

unless the area covered by the previously suspended or revoked permit has been completely reclaimed by the responsible operator in compliance with the provisions of this part at no cost to the state.

If the commissioner finds that any part of the operation would constitute a hazard to a dwelling house, public building, school, church, cemetery, commercial or institutional building, public road, stream, lake, reservoir, water wells, officially designated scenic areas or other private or public property, the commissioner shall delete such part of the land from the area for which the permit is granted.

The applicant for a surface mining permit shall give public notice at least one (1) day prior to the filing of an application in a newspaper of general circulation covering the county where the proposed surface mine is to be located of the applicant's intent to operate a surface mine, and its proposed location. The information to be included in the public notice shall conform to regulations issued by the commissioner. In addition, the commissioner will receive any written statements from any interested person or groups of persons, and such statements shall be taken into consideration when the commissioner makes a determination of the application. The commissioner shall then, in not less than forty-five (45) nor more than sixty (60) days from the filing of the application for a permit, either approve application or notify the operator in writing, stating in detail the reason for not approving the application. If the application is approved, the permit will be granted upon the posting of the required bond. The action on the part of the commissioner in failing to grant any permit may be appealed to the board and the courts as provided in the Tennessee Coal Surface Mining Law of 1980, compiled in part 3 of this chapter.

Any holder of a valid surface mining permit issued pursuant to this part who wishes to continue the operation beyond the original permit expiration date shall make application for renewal within sixty (60) days prior to the expiration date of such permit, and upon meeting the requirements set forth in subdivisions (a)(1)-(9), and any rules and regulations pertaining to those requirements, the renewal shall be granted.

Permits and the associated applications, hearings, and other actions required by this section and part shall be conducted in accordance with title 13, chapter 18 when the permit or action involves a major energy project, as defined in § 13-18-102.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 5; 1974, ch. 590, §§ 3, 4; 1976, ch. 605, § 1; 1977, ch. 164, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A., § 58-1544; Acts 1980, ch. 695, § 2; 1980, ch. 908, § 40; 1981, ch. 131, § 37; 1990, ch. 890, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 14.

Law Reviews.

Legislative Clarification of the Correlative Rights of Surface and Mineral Owners (J. Stephen Dycus), 33 Vand. L. Rev. 871.

59-8-206. Fees.

The permit shall consist of a basic fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each year of the permit, plus an additional acreage fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each acre or fraction thereof of the land affected by the operation, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for such acreage fee, but in subsequent years no acreage fee will be charged for any acre on which the acreage fee has already been paid in the preceding years. No permit fee shall be charged for land upon which overburden is deposited if, in the opinion of the commissioner, the deposition of such overburden amounts to reclamation of a previously mined area. The supplemental basic fee for an amendment of a permit shall be fifty dollars ($50.00), and to the extent the amendment entails an increase or decrease in the acreage covered by the permit, the total acreage fee paid for the year shall be correspondingly increased or decreased by the amount per acre or fraction thereof specified hereinabove.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 6; 1974, ch. 590, § 11; T.C.A., § 58-1545; Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 41; 1990, ch. 890, § 3.

59-8-207. Performance bonds.

The bond filed with the commissioner shall be payable to the state of Tennessee and shall be executed by the operator and a corporate surety that is approved by the commissioner and properly authorized to act as corporate surety and licensed to do business in this state; provided, however, that the operator may elect to deposit cash, irrevocable letters of credit or certificates of deposit with the state treasurer in lieu of a corporate surety if the instruments are executed in accordance with guidelines set forth by the commissioner. The state treasurer shall receive and hold the deposits in the name of the state of Tennessee, in trust, for the purposes for which the deposit is made and shall at all times be responsible for the custody and safekeeping of the deposits. The operator making the deposit shall be entitled from time to time to demand and receive from the treasurer, on the written order of the commissioner, the whole or any portion of any instruments so deposited upon depositing with the treasurer, in lieu of the deposits, other instruments of the classes specified in this section having a value at least equal to the sum of the bond or instrument and also to demand and recover any interest income from instruments as the interest becomes due and payable.

The bond or cash deposit or marketable value of the securities, which shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the provisions of this part, shall not be less than six hundred dollars ($600) for each estimated acre or fraction thereof affected by the respective operation. Liability under such bond shall be continuous until the reclamation provisions of this part have been fulfilled. The amount of the bond shall be increased or decreased to take account of any change in the acreage covered by the permit as provided in § 59-8-205(a)(2).

In those counties requiring a performance bond of two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more per acre, the operator may at the operator's option present evidence of such bond to the commissioner in lieu of filing a bond with the commissioner. The commissioner may in the commissioner's discretion accept such evidence of the existence of such a performance bond in lieu of a bond filed with the commissioner. However, if the bond is released by county authorities prior to such time as the commissioner would normally release all or part of it, the commissioner may require a new performance bond to be filed as required by this section.

No performance bond shall be charged for land upon which overburden is deposited if, in the opinion of the commissioner, the deposition of such overburden amounts to reclamation of a previously mined area.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 7; 1974, ch. 590, §§ 5, 12; T.C.A., § 58-1546; Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 42; 2009, ch. 211, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning reclamation after extraction of minerals on state-owned land, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 211.

59-8-208. Mining and reclamation plans.

Each operator shall prepare and carry out a mining and reclamation plan for the area affected by the operator's operation, such plan to be submitted by the operator for the commissioner's approval with the application for a permit. Such plan shall provide for:

Regrading the area to approximately the original or rolling topography, and elimination of all highwalls, spoil piles, and water-collecting depressions to the extent that such can be done with available overburden. Demonstrated new technology methods, approved by the commissioner, will be acceptable for highwall elimination and those established spoil piles, which no longer pose hazards to the environment as determined by the commissioner, shall not be included;

Water drainage and silt control for all the affected areas so as to strictly control soil erosion, damage to adjacent lands, and pollution of streams and other waters, both during and following the mining operations. As mining begins, all drainways for the affected area shall be protected with silt traps or dams of approved design as directed by the regulations. The operator may elect to impound water to provide lakes or ponds of approved design for wildlife, recreational, or water supply purposes if it is a part of the approved reclamation plan;

Revegetation of the affected area as provided in § 59-8-209;

If the land is restored to permit cultivating with normal farm machinery, the operator is relieved of all further rehabilitation, except seeding with grass or legumes during the next growing season for quick erosion control;

Carrying out any additional reclamation work required by the rules and regulations adopted by the commissioner;

A description of the use to which the area affected will be placed at the conclusion of reclamation; and

When mining is temporarily terminated at a particular mining site or sites with substantial minerals remaining for probable future production, the operator is permitted to reclaim mined areas other than those included in the operator's current operations in lieu of reclaiming the mined areas where the mining has temporarily ceased.

In addition to the requirements specified in subsection (a), the mining and reclamation plan submitted by the operator in connection with the operator's application for a permit shall include a detailed topographic map, prepared by a qualified engineer, geologist or other qualified professional approved by the commissioner, on a United States geological survey map, or aerial photograph, or equivalent as may be approved by the commissioner, and on such scale as the commissioner shall require by regulation showing:

The area of land affected, the location of the stream or streams or any standing body of water into which the area drains, the location of drainways and the planned siltation traps and other impoundments, and the location of haul or other access roads to be prepared or used by the operator in the mining operation;

The location of any buildings, cemeteries, public highways, railroad tracks, gas and oil wells, publicly owned land, officially designated scenic areas, utility lines, underground mines, transmission lines or pipe lines within the affected area or within five hundred feet (500') thereof;

The approximate location of the cuts or excavations to be made in the surface and the estimated location and height of spoil banks, and the total number of acres involved in the area of land affected; and

The date the map was prepared, together with a certification as to its accuracy by the person responsible for its preparation.

The surface mining application will be accompanied by a detailed mining plan showing the depth and character of overburden; the thickness of the mineral being mined; method of mining; mine waste disposal areas; the manner, timing and distance for backfilling, grading work; final mine waste disposal areas and final shape of stable slope; and a reclamation plan for haul roads that are to be left, which proposals shall meet the provisions of this section and all rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the commissioner. The application shall assure that all reshaping will be completed within such time as permitted by the commissioner's regulations which shall not be more than three (3) months, weather permitting, after completion of the removal of the mineral being mined.

The mining and reclamation plan may, with the commissioner's approval, be changed at any time upon application of the operator, to take account of changes in conditions or to correct any previous oversight. After approval of a mining and reclamation plan or any amendment thereof by the commissioner, the operator shall not depart therefrom without the commissioner's further approval. The plan shall be carried out concurrently with the surface mining operation and all of the reclamation work shall be completed with respect to each acre within such time as permitted by the commissioner's regulations, which shall not be more than one (1) year after completion of the mining operation with respect to each such acre. Each operator shall file periodic reports, within such times and covering such periods as the commissioner shall reasonably require, showing those portions of the affected area for which reclamation in accordance with the approved plan has been completed. The commissioner shall inspect such areas and shall notify the operator whether the reclamation is accepted as being in accordance with the approved plan or whether there are deficiencies which must be corrected.

Any plan required by this section or part shall be prepared in accordance with the procedures set out in title 13, chapter 18 when such plan involves a major energy project, as defined in § 13-18-102.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 8; 1974, ch. 590, §§ 6, 7; 1975, ch. 310, § 2; 1976, ch. 752, § 2; 1978, ch. 679, § 2; T.C.A., § 58-1547; Acts 1980, ch. 695, § 3; 1980, ch. 908, § 43; 1981, ch. 131, § 38; 1992, ch. 1011, § 1.

59-8-209. Revegetation plan.

Each operator shall submit for the commissioner's approval and carry out after such approval a plan for preparation of the soil and subsequent revegetation of the affected area. Such plan shall take into consideration the approved after-use of the area affected and shall be designed to achieve quick and permanent soil stabilization by the planting of trees or shrubs or grasses or legumes or any prescribed combination thereof. The operator's obligation under the provisions of this part shall not be deemed discharged until the operator has provided revegetation which conforms to the revegetation standards established by the commissioner.

After the initial planting of the vegetative cover in accordance with the approved plan, the commissioner shall issue to the operator and the operator's surety a release of the surety bond for each acre of the affected area with respect to which the approved reclamation plan has been carried out, less the sum of three hundred dollars ($300) which shall be in force and effect until satisfactory revegetation survival has been accomplished, the revegetation plan previously approved by the commissioner has been carried out, the commissioner has determined that further efforts toward revegetation are impractical, or until it has been forfeited by the operator.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 9; 1974, ch. 590, § 8; T.C.A., § 58-1548; Acts 1980, ch. 695, § 4; 1980, ch. 908, § 44.

59-8-210. Annual report to be filed with commissioner.

Within such time as the commissioner shall prescribe, the operator shall file with the commissioner an annual report and map under each permit, stating the number of acres of land affected by the operation, the extent of reclamation and revegetation accomplished by the operator, and such other information as the commissioner may reasonably require in carrying out the provisions of this part. If the report and the commissioner's inspection of the area affected show that the operator has complied fully with this part, the commissioner shall approve the report and shall release the operator's bond, or the remainder thereof if any portion has already been released under other provisions of this part. If the commissioner does not approve the report, the bond shall not be released until the operator corrects the deficiencies found by the commissioner.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 10; T.C.A., § 58-1549.

59-8-211. Notice of noncompliance — Forfeiture of bond.

If any of the requirements of this part or rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto or the orders of the commissioner have not been complied with within the time limits set by the commissioner or by this part, the commissioner shall cause a notice of noncompliance to be served upon the operator, or, where found necessary, the commissioner shall order suspension of a permit. Such notice or order shall be handed to the operator in person or served by certified mail addressed to the permanent address shown on the application for a permit. The notice of noncompliance or order of suspension shall specify in what respects the operator has failed to comply with this chapter or the regulations or orders of the commissioner.

If the operator has not reached an agreement with the commissioner or has not complied with the requirements set forth in the notice of noncompliance or order of suspension within time limits set therein, the permit may be revoked by order of the commissioner and the performance bond shall then be forfeited to the commissioner. When a bond is forfeited pursuant to this part, the commissioner shall give notice to the attorney general and reporter who shall collect the forfeiture.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 11; T.C.A., § 58-1550.

59-8-212. Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund — Other available funds. [Current version. See second version of section and Compiler's Notes.]

All sums received through the payment of fees or the forfeiture of bonds shall be placed in the state treasury and credited to a special agency account to be designated as the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund. This fund, appropriations for which are also authorized, shall be available to the commissioner for expenditure for the reclamation and revegetation of land affected by surface mining operations, including lands so affected prior to enactment of this part; provided, that the proceeds from the forfeiture of any bond shall be used to the extent required in completing reclamation and revegetation of the area with respect to which the bond was posted. Any unencumbered and any unexpended balance of this fund remaining at the end of any fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward for the purpose of reclamation and revegetation of land as provided in this section until expended.

Acts 1972, ch. 547, § 12; 1974, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., § 58-1551; Acts 1980, ch. 908, § 45.